West Virginia, session 2025, HB3373.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2E. WEST VIRGINIA TOURISM DEVELOPMENT ACT. §5B-2E-11. Termination. The Division of Economic Development may not accept any new project application after December 31, 2030, and all applications submitted prior to January 1, 2031, that have not been previously approved or not approved, shall be deemed not approved and shall be null and void as of January 1, 2031. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home